Connecticut, session 2026, SB00002.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (3) of section 12-412 of the 2026 supplement to
2 the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
3 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026, and applicable to sales occurring on or after
4 October 1, 2026):
5 (3) (A) (i) The sale, furnishing or service of gas, including bottled gas,
6 and electricity when delivered to consumers through mains, lines, pipes
7 or bottles for use:
8 [(i) in] (I) In any residential dwelling; [or]
9 [(ii) directly] (II) Directly in agricultural production, fabrication of a
10 finished product to be sold or an industrial manufacturing plant,
11 provided the exemption under this [subdivision (ii)] subclause shall
12 only be allowed with respect to a metered building, location or premise
13 at which not less than seventy-five per cent of the gas, including bottled
14 gas, or electricity consumed at such metered building, location or
15 premise is used for the purpose of such production, fabrication or
LCO No. 2737 1 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
16 manufacturing; or
17 (III) By a commercial or industrial business that has gross income for
18 the previous income or taxable year that does not exceed ten million
19 dollars.
20 (ii) Bottled gas as used in this subsection means L.P. (propane) gas.
21 (B) The sale or furnishing of telephone service and community
22 antenna television and cable service, provided the exemption for
23 services described in this subparagraph shall not be applicable to any
24 such service rendered on or after January 1, 1990.
25 (C) The sale, furnishing or service of water, steam and telegraph
26 when delivered to consumers through mains, lines, pipes or bottles.
27 (D) The sale or furnishing of electricity, not subject to the exemption
28 under subparagraph (A) of this subsection, with respect to that portion
29 of the charges applicable to such electricity for any month of service
30 which is not in excess of one hundred fifty dollars.
31 (E) The sale, furnishing or service of gas, water, steam or electricity
32 for use directly in the furnishing of gas, water, steam or electricity
33 delivered to consumers through mains, lines or pipes.
34 Sec. 2. Subdivision (1) of section 12-408 of the general statutes is
35 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
36 1, 2026, and applicable to sales occurring on or after October 1, 2026):
37 (1) (A) For the privilege of making any sales, as defined in
38 subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 12-407, at retail, in this state
39 for a consideration, a tax is hereby imposed on all retailers at the rate of
40 six and thirty-five-hundredths per cent of the gross receipts of any
41 retailer from the sale of all tangible personal property sold at retail or
42 from the rendering of any services constituting a sale in accordance with
43 subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 12-407, except, in lieu of said
44 rate, the rates provided in subparagraphs (B) to (I), inclusive, of this
LCO No. 2737 2 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
45 subdivision;
46 (B) (i) At a rate of fifteen per cent with respect to each transfer of
47 occupancy, from the total amount of rent received by a hotel or lodging
48 house for the first period not exceeding thirty consecutive calendar
49 days;
50 (ii) At a rate of eleven per cent with respect to each transfer of
51 occupancy, from the total amount of rent received by a bed and
52 breakfast establishment for the first period not exceeding thirty
53 consecutive calendar days;
54 (C) With respect to the sale of a motor vehicle to any individual who
55 is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is on full-time
56 active duty in Connecticut and who is considered, under 50 [App] USC
57 App 574, a resident of another state, or to any such individual and the
58 spouse thereof, at a rate of four and one-half per cent of the gross
59 receipts of any retailer from such sales, provided such retailer requires
60 and maintains a declaration by such individual, prescribed as to form
61 by the commissioner and bearing notice to the effect that false
62 statements made in such declaration are punishable, or other evidence,
63 satisfactory to the commissioner, concerning the purchaser's state of
64 residence under 50 [App] USC App 574;
65 (D) (i) With respect to the sales of computer and data processing
66 services occurring on or after July 1, 2001, at the rate of one per cent, and
67 (ii) with respect to sales of Internet access services, on and after July 1,
68 2001, such services shall be exempt from such tax;
69 (E) (i) With respect to the sales of labor that is otherwise taxable under
70 subparagraph (C) or (G) of subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section
71 12-407 on existing vessels and repair or maintenance services on vessels
72 occurring on and after July 1, 1999, such services shall be exempt from
73 such tax;
74 (ii) With respect to the sale of a vessel, a motor for a vessel or a trailer
LCO No. 2737 3 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
75 used for transporting a vessel, at the rate of two and ninety-nine-
76 hundredths per cent, except that the sale of a vessel shall be exempt from
77 such tax if such vessel is docked in this state for sixty or fewer days in a
78 calendar year;
79 (iii) With respect to the sale of dyed diesel fuel, as defined in
80 subsection (d) of section 12-487, sold by a marine fuel dock exclusively
81 for marine purposes, at the rate of two and ninety-nine-hundredths per
82 cent;
83 (F) With respect to patient care services for which payment is
84 received by the hospital on or after July 1, 1999, and prior to July 1, 2001,
85 at the rate of five and three-fourths per cent and on and after July 1, 2001,
86 such services shall be exempt from such tax;
87 (G) With respect to the rental or leasing of a passenger motor vehicle
88 for a period of thirty consecutive calendar days or less, at a rate of nine
89 and thirty-five-hundredths per cent;
90 (H) With respect to the sale of (i) a motor vehicle for a sales price
91 exceeding fifty thousand dollars, at a rate of seven and three-fourths per
92 cent on the entire sales price, (ii) jewelry, whether real or imitation, for
93 a sales price exceeding five thousand dollars, at a rate of seven and
94 three-fourths per cent on the entire sales price, and (iii) an article of
95 clothing or footwear intended to be worn on or about the human body,
96 a handbag, luggage, umbrella, wallet or watch for a sales price
97 exceeding one thousand dollars, at a rate of seven and three-fourths per
98 cent on the entire sales price. For purposes of this subparagraph, "motor
99 vehicle" has the meaning provided in section 14-1, but does not include
100 a motor vehicle subject to the provisions of subparagraph (C) of this
101 subdivision, a motor vehicle having a gross vehicle weight rating over
102 twelve thousand five hundred pounds, or a motor vehicle having a
103 gross vehicle weight rating of twelve thousand five hundred pounds or
104 less that is not used for private passenger purposes, but is designed or
105 used to transport merchandise, freight or persons in connection with
106 any business enterprise and issued a commercial registration or more
LCO No. 2737 4 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
107 specific type of registration by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
108 (I) With respect to the sale of meals, as defined in subdivision (13) of
109 section 12-412, sold by an eating establishment, caterer or grocery store;
110 and spirituous, malt or vinous liquors, soft drinks, sodas or beverages
111 such as are ordinarily dispensed at bars and soda fountains, or in
112 connection therewith; in addition to the tax imposed under
113 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, at the rate of one per cent;
114 (J) The rate of tax imposed by this chapter shall be applicable to all
115 retail sales upon the effective date of such rate, except that a new rate
116 that represents an increase in the rate applicable to the sale shall not
117 apply to any sales transaction wherein a binding sales contract without
118 an escalator clause has been entered into prior to the effective date of the
119 new rate and delivery is made within ninety days after the effective date
120 of the new rate. For the purposes of payment of the tax imposed under
121 this section, any retailer of services taxable under subdivision (37) of
122 subsection (a) of section 12-407, who computes taxable income, for
123 purposes of taxation under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any
124 subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of the United States,
125 as amended from time to time, on an accounting basis that recognizes
126 only cash or other valuable consideration actually received as income
127 and who is liable for such tax only due to the rendering of such services
128 may make payments related to such tax for the period during which
129 such income is received, without penalty or interest, without regard to
130 when such service is rendered;
131 (K) (i) For calendar quarters ending on or after September 30, 2019,
132 the commissioner shall deposit into the regional planning incentive
133 account, established pursuant to section 4-66k, six and seven-tenths per
134 cent of the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
135 subparagraph (B) of this subdivision and ten and seven-tenths per cent
136 of the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
137 subparagraph (G) of this subdivision;
138 (ii) For calendar quarters ending on or after September 30, 2018, the
LCO No. 2737 5 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
139 commissioner shall deposit into the Tourism Fund established under
140 section 10-395b ten per cent of the amounts received by the state from
141 the tax imposed under subparagraph (B) of this subdivision;
142 (L) (i) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2021, but
143 prior to July 1, 2023, the commissioner shall deposit into the municipal
144 revenue sharing account established pursuant to section 4-66l seven and
145 nine-tenths per cent of the amounts received by the state from the tax
146 imposed under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, including such
147 amounts received on or after July 1, 2023, attributable to the fiscal year
148 ending June 30, 2023; and
149 (ii) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2023, the
150 commissioner shall deposit into the Municipal Revenue Sharing Fund
151 established pursuant to section 4-66p seven and nine-tenths per cent of
152 the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
153 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision; [and]
154 (M) (i) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2017, the
155 commissioner shall deposit into the Special Transportation Fund
156 established under section 13b-68 seven and nine-tenths per cent of the
157 amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
158 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision;
159 (ii) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2018, but
160 prior to July 1, 2019, the commissioner shall deposit into the Special
161 Transportation Fund established under section 13b-68 eight per cent of
162 the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
163 subparagraphs (A) and (H) of this subdivision on the sale of a motor
164 vehicle;
165 (iii) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2019, but
166 prior to July 1, 2020, the commissioner shall deposit into the Special
167 Transportation Fund established under section 13b-68 seventeen per
168 cent of the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
169 subparagraphs (A) and (H) of this subdivision on the sale of a motor
LCO No. 2737 6 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
170 vehicle;
171 (iv) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2020, but
172 prior to July 1, 2021, the commissioner shall deposit into the Special
173 Transportation Fund established under section 13b-68 twenty-five per
174 cent of the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
175 subparagraphs (A) and (H) of this subdivision on the sale of a motor
176 vehicle;
177 (v) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2021, but
178 prior to July 1, 2022, the commissioner shall deposit into the Special
179 Transportation Fund established under section 13b-68 seventy-five per
180 cent of the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
181 subparagraphs (A) and (H) of this subdivision on the sale of a motor
182 vehicle; and
183 (vi) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2022, the
184 commissioner shall deposit into the Special Transportation Fund
185 established under section 13b-68 one hundred per cent of the amounts
186 received by the state from the tax imposed under subparagraphs (A)
187 and (H) of this subdivision on the sale of a motor vehicle; and
188 (N) For calendar months commencing on or after October 1, 2026, the
189 commissioner shall deposit fifty per cent of the amounts received by the
190 state from the tax imposed under subparagraph (I) of this subdivision
191 into the Tourism Fund established under section 10-395b and fifty per
192 cent of such amounts in the municipal diversification account
193 established under section 4 of this act.
194 Sec. 3. Subdivision (1) of section 12-411 of the general statutes is
195 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
196 1, 2026, and applicable to sales occurring on or after October 1, 2026):
197 (1) (A) An excise tax is hereby imposed on the storage, acceptance,
198 consumption or any other use in this state of tangible personal property
199 purchased from any retailer for storage, acceptance, consumption or any
LCO No. 2737 7 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
200 other use in this state, the acceptance or receipt of any services
201 constituting a sale in accordance with subdivision (2) of subsection (a)
202 of section 12-407, purchased from any retailer for consumption or use in
203 this state, or the storage, acceptance, consumption or any other use in
204 this state of tangible personal property which has been manufactured,
205 fabricated, assembled or processed from materials by a person, either
206 within or without this state, for storage, acceptance, consumption or any
207 other use by such person in this state, to be measured by the sales price
208 of materials, at the rate of six and thirty-five-hundredths per cent of the
209 sales price of such property or services, except, in lieu of said rate:
210 (B) (i) At a rate of fifteen per cent of the rent paid to a hotel or lodging
211 house for the first period not exceeding thirty consecutive calendar
212 days;
213 (ii) At a rate of eleven per cent of the rent paid to a bed and breakfast
214 establishment for the first period not exceeding thirty consecutive
215 calendar days;
216 (C) With respect to the storage, acceptance, consumption or use in
217 this state of a motor vehicle purchased from any retailer for storage,
218 acceptance, consumption or use in this state by any individual who is a
219 member of the armed forces of the United States and is on full-time
220 active duty in Connecticut and who is considered, under 50 [App] USC
221 App 574, a resident of another state, or to any such individual and the
222 spouse of such individual at a rate of four and one-half per cent of the
223 sales price of such vehicle, provided such retailer requires and
224 maintains a declaration by such individual, prescribed as to form by the
225 commissioner and bearing notice to the effect that false statements made
226 in such declaration are punishable, or other evidence, satisfactory to the
227 commissioner, concerning the purchaser's state of residence under 50
228 [App] USC App 574;
229 (D) (i) With respect to the acceptance or receipt in this state of labor
230 that is otherwise taxable under subparagraph (C) or (G) of subdivision
231 (2) of subsection (a) of section 12-407 on existing vessels and repair or
LCO No. 2737 8 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
232 maintenance services on vessels occurring on and after July 1, 1999, such
233 services shall be exempt from such tax;
234 (ii) (I) With respect to the storage, acceptance or other use of a vessel
235 in this state, at the rate of two and ninety-nine-hundredths per cent,
236 except that such storage, acceptance or other use shall be exempt from
237 such tax if such vessel is docked in this state for sixty or fewer days in a
238 calendar year;
239 (II) With respect to the storage, acceptance or other use of a motor for
240 a vessel or a trailer used for transporting a vessel in this state, at the rate
241 of two and ninety-nine-hundredths per cent;
242 (III) With respect to the storage, acceptance or other use of dyed diesel
243 fuel, as defined in subsection (d) of section 12-487, exclusively for
244 marine purposes, at the rate of two and ninety-nine-hundredths per
245 cent;
246 (E) (i) With respect to the acceptance or receipt in this state of
247 computer and data processing services purchased from any retailer for
248 consumption or use in this state occurring on or after July 1, 2001, at the
249 rate of one per cent of such services, and (ii) with respect to the
250 acceptance or receipt in this state of Internet access services, on and after
251 July 1, 2001, such services shall be exempt from such tax;
252 (F) With respect to the acceptance or receipt in this state of patient
253 care services purchased from any retailer for consumption or use in this
254 state for which payment is received by the hospital on or after July 1,
255 1999, and prior to July 1, 2001, at the rate of five and three-fourths per
256 cent and on and after July 1, 2001, such services shall be exempt from
257 such tax;
258 (G) With respect to the rental or leasing of a passenger motor vehicle
259 for a period of thirty consecutive calendar days or less, at a rate of nine
260 and thirty-five-hundredths per cent;
261 (H) With respect to the acceptance or receipt in this state of (i) a motor
LCO No. 2737 9 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
262 vehicle for a sales price exceeding fifty thousand dollars, at a rate of
263 seven and three-fourths per cent on the entire sales price, (ii) jewelry,
264 whether real or imitation, for a sales price exceeding five thousand
265 dollars, at a rate of seven and three-fourths per cent on the entire sales
266 price, and (iii) an article of clothing or footwear intended to be worn on
267 or about the human body, a handbag, luggage, umbrella, wallet or
268 watch for a sales price exceeding one thousand dollars, at a rate of seven
269 and three-fourths per cent on the entire sales price. For purposes of this
270 subparagraph, "motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in section 14-
271 1, but does not include a motor vehicle subject to the provisions of
272 subparagraph (C) of this subdivision, a motor vehicle having a gross
273 vehicle weight rating over twelve thousand five hundred pounds, or a
274 motor vehicle having a gross vehicle weight rating of twelve thousand
275 five hundred pounds or less that is not used for private passenger
276 purposes, but is designed or used to transport merchandise, freight or
277 persons in connection with any business enterprise and issued a
278 commercial registration or more specific type of registration by the
279 Department of Motor Vehicles;
280 (I) With respect to the acceptance or receipt in this state of meals, as
281 defined in subdivision (13) of section 12-412, sold by an eating
282 establishment, caterer or grocery store; and spirituous, malt or vinous
283 liquors, soft drinks, sodas or beverages such as are ordinarily dispensed
284 at bars and soda fountains, or in connection therewith; in addition to the
285 tax imposed under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, at the rate of
286 one per cent;
287 (J) (i) For calendar quarters ending on or after September 30, 2019, the
288 commissioner shall deposit into the regional planning incentive
289 account, established pursuant to section 4-66k, six and seven-tenths per
290 cent of the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
291 subparagraph (B) of this subdivision and ten and seven-tenths per cent
292 of the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
293 subparagraph (G) of this subdivision;
LCO No. 2737 10 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
294 (ii) For calendar quarters ending on or after September 30, 2018, the
295 commissioner shall deposit into the Tourism Fund established under
296 section 10-395b ten per cent of the amounts received by the state from
297 the tax imposed under subparagraph (B) of this subdivision;
298 (K) (i) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2021, but
299 prior to July 1, 2023, the commissioner shall deposit into the municipal
300 revenue sharing account established pursuant to section 4-66l seven and
301 nine-tenths per cent of the amounts received by the state from the tax
302 imposed under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, including such
303 amounts received on or after July 1, 2023, attributable to the fiscal year
304 ending June 30, 2023; and
305 (ii) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2023, the
306 commissioner shall deposit into the Municipal Revenue Sharing Fund
307 established pursuant to section 4-66p seven and nine-tenths per cent of
308 the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
309 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision; [and]
310 (L) (i) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2017, the
311 commissioner shall deposit into said Special Transportation Fund seven
312 and nine-tenths per cent of the amounts received by the state from the
313 tax imposed under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision;
314 (ii) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2018, but
315 prior to July 1, 2019, the commissioner shall deposit into the Special
316 Transportation Fund established under section 13b-68 eight per cent of
317 the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
318 subparagraphs (A) and (H) of this subdivision on the acceptance or
319 receipt in this state of a motor vehicle;
320 (iii) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2019, but
321 prior to July 1, 2020, the commissioner shall deposit into the Special
322 Transportation Fund established under section 13b-68 seventeen per
323 cent of the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
324 subparagraphs (A) and (H) of this subdivision on the acceptance or
LCO No. 2737 11 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
325 receipt in this state of a motor vehicle;
326 (iv) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2020, but
327 prior to July 1, 2021, the commissioner shall deposit into the Special
328 Transportation Fund established under section 13b-68 twenty-five per
329 cent of the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
330 subparagraphs (A) and (H) of this subdivision on the acceptance or
331 receipt in this state of a motor vehicle;
332 (v) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2021, but
333 prior to July 1, 2022, the commissioner shall deposit into the Special
334 Transportation Fund established under section 13b-68 seventy-five per
335 cent of the amounts received by the state from the tax imposed under
336 subparagraphs (A) and (H) of this subdivision on the acceptance or
337 receipt in this state of a motor vehicle; and
338 (vi) For calendar months commencing on or after July 1, 2022, the
339 commissioner shall deposit into the Special Transportation Fund
340 established under section 13b-68 one hundred per cent of the amounts
341 received by the state from the tax imposed under subparagraphs (A)
342 and (H) of this subdivision on the acceptance or receipt in this state of a
343 motor vehicle; and
344 (M) For calendar months commencing on or after October 1, 2026, the
345 commissioner shall deposit fifty per cent of the amounts received by the
346 state from the tax imposed under subparagraph (I) of this subdivision
347 into the Tourism Fund established under section 10-395b and fifty per
348 cent of such amounts in the municipal diversification account
349 established under section 4 of this act.
350 Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) There is established an
351 account to be known as the "municipal diversification account", which
352 shall be a separate, nonlapsing account. The account shall contain any
353 moneys required by law to be deposited in the account. Moneys in the
354 account shall be expended by the Commissioner of Revenue Services for
355 the purpose of distributing funds to municipalities in accordance with
LCO No. 2737 12 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
356 the provisions of this section.
357 (b) The commissioner shall maintain an accounting aggregated by
358 municipality, of the amounts deposited in the municipal diversification
359 account pursuant to subparagraph (N) of subdivision (1) of section 12-
360 408 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, and subparagraph
361 (M) of subdivision (1) of section 12-411 of the general statutes, as
362 amended by this act.
363 (c) Commencing in the calendar quarter ending March 31, 2027, and
364 in each calendar quarter thereafter, the commissioner shall distribute
365 moneys from the account to each municipality where the revenue from
366 the tax imposed under subparagraph (I) of subdivision (1) of section 12-
367 408 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, and subparagraph (I)
368 of subdivision (1) of section 12-411 of the general statutes, as amended
369 by this act, was generated, as determined by the commissioner. Any
370 moneys for which the commissioner cannot determine a point-of-sale
371 shall be distributed pro rata to the municipalities that reported sales of
372 meals, as defined in subdivision (13) of section 12-412 of the general
373 statutes, in the return filed under chapter 219 of the general statutes for
374 the applicable calendar quarter.
375 Sec. 5. Section 12-408d of the general statutes is repealed and the
376 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
377 (a) For calendar quarters commencing on or after July 1, 2004, any
378 retailer with sales in more than one town in this state, for which sales
379 such retailer files a return under this chapter, shall disaggregate the
380 information in the return, in such form as may be prescribed by the
381 Commissioner of Revenue Services, to indicate the town in which sales
382 occurred for which tax was collected by such retailer and the amount of
383 such tax collected, by town.
384 (b) For calendar quarters commencing on or after October 1, 2026, any
385 retailer described in subsection (a) of this section with sales of meals, as
386 defined in subdivision (13) of section 12-412, where meals are not the
LCO No. 2737 13 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
387 only items sold by such retailer, shall list the sales of meals separately in
388 the return such retailer files under this chapter and disaggregate the
389 information, if applicable, as set forth in subsection (a) of this section.
390 Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a
391 Connecticut-India Trade Commission, which shall be part of the
392 Legislative Department.
393 (b) The commission shall consist of the following members:
394 (1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;
395 (2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
396 (3) Two appointed by the majority leader of the House of
397 Representatives;
398 (4) Two appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
399 (5) Two appointed by the minority leader of the House of
400 Representatives;
401 (6) Two appointed by the minority leader of the Senate;
402 (7) Two members of the joint standing committee of the General
403 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to commerce, one of
404 whom shall be appointed by the Senate chairperson of such committee
405 and one of whom shall be appointed by the House chairperson of such
406 committee;
407 (8) The ranking members of the joint standing committee of the
408 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to commerce,
409 or their designees;
410 (9) Three persons appointed by the Governor;
411 (10) A representative of a public institution of higher education in the
412 state, who shall be appointed by the Governor;
LCO No. 2737 14 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
413 (11) A representative of a chamber of commerce in the state, who shall
414 be appointed by the Governor; and
415 (12) Two representatives of Indian or Indian-American communities
416 in the state, who shall be appointed by the Governor and shall not be
417 members of the same political party.
418 (c) The members of the commission shall each have current or past
419 involvement in organizations that promote Indian affairs or are
420 interested in the well-being of trade relations between the state and
421 India.
422 (d) Any member of the commission appointed under subdivisions (1)
423 to (6), inclusive, of subsection (b) of this section may be a member of the
424 General Assembly.
425 (e) (1) All initial appointments to the commission shall be made not
426 later than October 1, 2026. Initial appointments made by the Governor,
427 the majority leader of the House of Representatives and the minority
428 leader of the House of Representatives shall terminate on September 30,
429 2029. Initial appointments made by the speaker of the House of
430 Representatives, the president pro tempore of the Senate, the majority
431 leader of the Senate and the minority leader of the Senate shall terminate
432 on September 30, 2030. The initial and subsequent terms of members
433 appointed by the chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the
434 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to commerce
435 shall be coterminous with the terms of the appointing authority for each
436 such member in accordance with the provisions of section 4-1a of the
437 general statutes.
438 (2) Appointed members of the commission shall serve for four-year
439 terms which shall commence on the date of appointment, except as
440 provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection. Members shall continue
441 to serve until their successors are appointed.
442 (f) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
LCO No. 2737 15 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
443 tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the commission
444 from among the members of the commission. Such chairpersons shall
445 schedule the first meeting of the commission, which shall be held not
446 later than November 1, 2026.
447 (g) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
448 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to commerce
449 shall serve as administrative staff of the commission.
450 (h) Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority. Any
451 vacancy occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled for the
452 balance of the unexpired term.
453 (i) A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the
454 transaction of any business.
455 (j) The members of the commission shall serve without
456 compensation, but shall, within the limits of available funds, be
457 reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of
458 their duties.
459 (k) The commission shall have the following powers and duties: (1)
460 To advance bilateral trade and investment between the state and India;
461 (2) to initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to the state
462 and India; (3) to promote business and academic exchanges between the
463 state and India; (4) to encourage mutual economic support between the
464 state and India; (5) to encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure
465 of the state and India; (6) to address such other issues as determined by
466 the commission; (7) to obtain from any executive department, board,
467 commission or other agency of the state such assistance and data as are
468 necessary and available to carry out the purposes of this section; (8) to
469 accept any gift, donation or bequest for the purpose of performing the
470 duties described in this section; and (9) to perform such other acts as
471 may be necessary and appropriate to carry out the duties described in
472 this section.
LCO No. 2737 16 of 18

Committee Bill No. 2
473 (l) The commission shall meet as often as deemed necessary by the
474 chairpersons or a majority of the commission. Any appointed member
475 who fails to attend three consecutive meetings or who fails to attend
476 fifty per cent of all meetings held during any calendar year shall be
477 deemed to have resigned from the commission.
478 (m) Not later than February 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
479 commission shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
480 section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the Governor, the Commissioner
481 of Economic and Community Development and the joint standing
482 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
483 relating to commerce on the activities of the commission during the
484 preceding year, which shall include, but need not be limited to, any
485 recommendations for policy changes and amendments to the general
486 statutes necessary to effectuate the purposes of the commission.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026, and 12-412(3)
applicable to sales
occurring on or after
October 1, 2026
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026, and 12-408(1)
applicable to sales
occurring on or after
October 1, 2026
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026, and 12-411(1)
applicable to sales
occurring on or after
October 1, 2026
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 12-408d
Sec. 6 from passage New section